Kentucky statutes. TITLE VII Public Property and Public Printing
Legislative Approval of State Fiscal Obligations

56.870.
Approval of General Assembly required for certain state fiscal obligations — Statement for inclusion on bonds and notes and related materials on Commonwealth’s involvement.

Notwithstanding any statutory provisions to the contrary, prior to the issuance and sale of any definitive bonds or temporary bonds, or the securing of any interim financing through bond anticipation notes, loan agreements, or by any other means, each agency, authority, board, corporation, cabinet, commission, or any other agency or instrumentality of the Commonwealth shall first obtain approval of financing from the General Assembly, sitting in regular or special session. This approval shall be evidenced by the adoption by the General Assembly of a specific act or the adoption by the General Assembly of the biennial branch budget bill which specifies the purposes for the financing.

The biennial branch budget bill shall also establish a ceiling for revenue bonds which require a general fund or road fund appropriation to retire.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not be applicable to the financing of any project in any case where the project for which financing is proposed is certified by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet to be of a type that will independently produce revenues sufficient to fully meet debt service, issuance costs, reserve fund requirements, insurance premiums, and any other expenditures necessary for financing so that no appropriation of state funds will be required. Repayments of revolving funds established with bond issues for which debt service, issuance costs, reserve fund requirements, insurance premiums, or any other expenditures associated with the issuance of the bonds are appropriated by the General Assembly shall not be deemed independently produced revenue. This certification shall be made in writing by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet to the statutory head of the issuing agency or authority with a copy to the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission.

The following statement shall appear on all bonds or notes and all prospectuses offering statements or related materials used in conjunction with the sale of bonds or notes for which financing is certified in accordance with the provisions of subsection (3) of this section: “Kentucky’s name is on these bonds (or notes) for the benefit and convenience of other entities within the state. However, the only security which is pledged for the bonds (or notes) is the independent revenues and assets from the project. The General Assembly does not intend to appropriate any state funds to fulfill the financial obligation represented by the bonds (or notes).”

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 96, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 450, § 62, effective July 1, 1983; 1990, ch. 507, § 19, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 105, § 53, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 295, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 53, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Although legislative approval of the fiscal obligations created by the issuance, by a “child” corporation of the Kentucky Housing Corporation, of housing construction loan notes and revenue bonds, would not normally be necessary under subsection (3) of this section because no appropriations are involved, the specific debt ceiling imposed upon the Kentucky Housing Authority by KRS

198A.090

would exempt the “child” corporation from the exclusion of this section since KRS

56.871

provides such exemption where a debt ceiling or specific authorization for debt service has been authorized by the General Assembly.

OAG 81-242

.

This section was intended to embrace actual state fiscal obligations, and is inapplicable to issuance of industrial revenue bonds by Kentucky Development Finance Authority for benefit of corporation which desired to finance new equipment.

OAG 83-453

.

The Development Finance Authority could issue bonds, without approval of the General Assembly, to generate a pool of funds to be lent to qualified businesses for various projects, using current proceeds from past loans to leverage the bond issue.

OAG 89-3

.

56.871.
Issuance and sale of certain bonds or notes exempt from provisions of KRS 56.870 to 56.874.

In any case in which the General Assembly has authorized a debt ceiling or a specific appropriation for debt service for a particular agency, authority, board, cabinet, commission, corporation, or other entity of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, the issuance and sale of definitive bonds or temporary bonds or notes necessary and sufficient to attain such debt ceiling or a specific appropriation for debt service shall be exempt from the provisions of KRS

56.870

to

56.874

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 96, § 2, effective July 15, 1980.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Although legislative approval of the fiscal obligations created by the issuance, by a “child” corporation of the Kentucky Housing Corporation, of housing construction loan notes and revenue bonds, would not normally be necessary under subsection (3) of KRS

56.870

because no appropriations are involved, the specific debt ceiling imposed upon the Kentucky Housing Authority by KRS

198A.090

would exempt the “child” corporation from the exclusion of KRS

56.870

since this section provides such exemption where a debt ceiling or specific authorization for debt service has been authorized by the General Assembly.

OAG 81-242

.

56.872.
Applicability — Report of secretary of Finance and Administration Cabinet to General Assembly — Procedure when cost exceeds cost approved by General Assembly.

Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS

56.870

(1), KRS

56.870

to

56.874

shall not apply to any financing by the Turnpike Authority of Kentucky until July 1, 1982, and shall not apply to any refinancing transaction by any agency, authority, board, corporation, cabinet, commission or other agency or instrumentality of the Commonwealth, if such refinancing transaction results in a net debt service savings to such agency, authority, board, corporation, cabinet, commission or other agency or instrumentality of the Commonwealth.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall report to the General Assembly in the branch budget recommendation, defined in KRS

48.010

, on the net debt service savings, any funds released from a debt service reserve fund or any other funds generated as a result of any refinancing or other mechanism approved by any agency, authority, board, corporation, cabinet, commission or other agency or instrumentality of the Commonwealth after July 15, 1986. No portion of any net debt service savings realized subsequent to a refinancing or open market bond purchase and available during the biennium in which the savings are realized, any debt service reserve fund released or other funds generated shall be expended for any of the purposes for which such agency, authority, board, corporation, cabinet, commission, or agency or instrumentality of the Commonwealth may be authorized by law to perform. The General Assembly shall on a biennial basis appropriate the net debt service savings as described, any debt service reserve fund or other funds generated, reported by the Finance and Administration Cabinet, to a special escrow account for each bond issue within the Finance and Administration Cabinet. The proceeds within this account shall be used to accelerate the payment of outstanding principal and interest, either through open market bond purchases or investments at maximum yield, in addition to the amounts budgeted for such purposes over the biennium, on definitive bonds, temporary bonds or interim financing secured by bond anticipation notes, loan agreements or other means issued by an agency, authority, board, corporation, cabinet, commission or other agency or instrumentality of the Commonwealth. The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall report to the General Assembly on a biennial basis the amount of total funds utilized in the escrow account to retire the outstanding principal and interest and the amount of principal and interest so retired, or to be retired, for each agency, authority, board, corporation, cabinet, commission or other agency or instrumentality of the Commonwealth. In the event that the funds appropriated to the escrow account cannot be used in the biennium for the purposes prescribed by this subsection, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall so report and provide the reasons therefor. The funds appropriated shall not lapse at the end of the biennium but be carried forward to the next biennium to be utilized for the purposes prescribed by this subsection.

In the event the cost of an authorized bond project exceeds its estimated cost, as approved by the General Assembly, the financing of such project may be authorized upon approval by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, so long as such cost does not exceed the estimated cost by more than twenty-five percent (25%). In the case of financing of any bond project approved by the General Assembly, the costs of issuance of bonds or notes shall be added to project costs in determining the principal amount of authorized financing of any such project.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 96, § 3, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 452, § 1, effective July 15, 1986.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Under KRS

58.050

and subsection (2) of this section the costs of issuing bonds, inclusive of bond discount, capitalized interest, and a debt service reserve, are in fact and as a matter of law proper “costs of issuance” of such bonds, to be added to the authorized level of a revenue bond financed project (which construction project costs are delineated in capital construction sections of the biennial appropriations and budget report) in arriving at the authorized financing of such project. The power to include such financing costs in the total bond package is an implied power of the State Property and Buildings Commission in issuing revenue bonds under KRS 56.450(4); this implied power is clearly and inevitably necessary in order that the commission may carry out its express power of issuing revenue bonds.

OAG 82-583

.

56.873.
Rating of proposed revenue bonds required.

Each proposed revenue bond shall be rated by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc. or an equivalent bond rating agency. No revenue bond issued may be sold that does not receive a Moody’s rating of at least A or the equivalent rating by another qualified bond rating agency.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 96, § 4, effective July 15, 1980.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The provisions of this section do not apply to pollution control and industrial development issues of the Kentucky Pollution Abatement Authority and the Kentucky Development Finance Authority, in cases where the bonds do not constitute a financial obligation, either direct or indirect, of such authorities, but are payable solely and only from private sources and where, consequently, no appropriation of state funds will or can ever be required.

OAG 80-591

.

Even though housing bond revenues are required to go into the State Treasury, subject to payment out to the trustee for sinking fund purposes, this section has no application to university housing revenue bonds, since the act (ch. 96, 1980) requires legislative approval only where state general fund expenditures are involved.

OAG 80-592

.

56.874.
Contracts with federal government for flood control projects requiring General Assembly approval.

Notwithstanding any statutory provision to the contrary, no individual, agency, authority, board, cabinet, commission, corporation, or other entity of, or representing the Commonwealth of Kentucky shall enter into any contract with any instrumentality of the federal government for the acquisition or construction of any flood control project, when the satisfaction of said contract requires, or could require, the appropriation of state funds not yet appropriated, without first obtaining approval of the General Assembly sitting in regular or special session.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 96, § 5, effective July 15, 1980.